Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-513.01
Service on
unincorporated association.

An unincorporated
association may be served by personal, residence, certified mail, or designated delivery service upon an officer
or managing agent, or by certified mail or
designated delivery service to the association at its usual place
of business, or by leaving the process at its usual place of business with
an employee of the unincorporated association.

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 30;

Laws 2011, LB669, § 15.